Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1059.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 14.1(b.2)(1) and 14.2(a)(2) and (3) of the act of June 30, 1981 (P.L.128, No.43), known as the Agricultural Area Security Law, are amended to read:Section 14.1. Purchase of agricultural conservation easements.* * *(b.2) Eligible nonprofit entity participation.--An eligible nonprofit entity may participate, along with an eligible county, the Commonwealth and a local government unit eligible to participate under subsection (b.1), in the preservation of farmland through the purchase of agricultural conservation easements.123456789101112131415161718 (1) The eligible nonprofit entity may purchase an agricultural conservation easement if all of the following apply:(i) The agricultural conservation easement is a joint purchase with the county and may include the Commonwealth or a local government unit, or both.(ii) The deed of agricultural conservation easement is as prescribed by the State board for agricultural conservation easements purchased by the Commonwealth.(iii) The eligible nonprofit entity does not seek reimbursement for the purchase of the agricultural conservation easement under section 14.6(b).* * *Section 14.2. Agricultural Conservation Easement Purchase Fund.(a) Purpose of fund.--* * *(2) Except as set forth in paragraph 3, the moneys appropriated to the fund shall be utilized in accordance with the expenditures and distribution authorized, required or otherwise provided in the program for purchase of agricultural conservation easements contained in section 14.1, and for the purpose of paying all costs, except administrative costs, incurred by the Commonwealth or a county incident to the purchase of agricultural conservation easements.[, and for the purpose of reimbursing nonprofit land conservation organizations for expenses incurred in acquiring and transferring agricultural conservation easements to the Commonwealth or a county.(3) Each fiscal year, up to $200,000 of the money in the fund may be used for the purpose of reimbursement allocation 20250HB1059PN1150 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under section 14.6(b). Up to 10% of these funds may be used for administrative expenses of the department incurred under section 14.6(b).](3) By March 1 of each year, the State board shall make the following annual allocations from the fund:(i) The greater amount of $1,000,000 or 80% of the amount restored to the fund under section 14.1(h)(8.2) for the purpose of reimbursing eligible nonprofit entities for the purchase of agricultural conservation easements under section 14.6(b). The amount allocated under this subparagraph shall not exceed 10% of the total annual allocation made under section 14.1(h).(ii) The amount of $200,000 plus 20% of the amount restored to the fund under section 14.1(h)(8.2) for the purpose of reimbursing eligible nonprofit entities for transaction expenses under section 14.6(c) relating to the purchase of agricultural conservation easements under section 14.6(b). Up to $20,000 of the amount allocated under this subparagraph for transaction expenses relating to the purchase of agricultural conservation easements may be used for administrative expenses incurred by the department under section 14.6(b) and (c).* * *Section 2. Section 14.6(b), (c), (d) and (e) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 14.6. Land Trust Reimbursement Program.* * *(b) Reimbursement.--[The State board may] In accordance with section 14.2(a)(3), the State board shall allocate funds to 20250HB1059PN1150 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reimburse land trusts for the purchase of agricultural conservation easements and for transaction expenses incurred in acquiring agricultural conservation easements in this Commonwealth. Money allocated under this subsection which has not been expended by December 31 of the year in which the money was allocated shall lapse back to the fund.(c) Eligible transaction expenses.--Eligible transaction expenses include:(1) Appraisals.(2) Legal services.(3) Title searches.(4) Document preparation.(5) Title insurance.(6) Closing fees.(7) Survey costs.(c.1) Eligible purchase expenses.--Eligible agricultural conservation easement purchase expenses under this section shall include payments by a land trust to acquire an agricultural conservation easement.(d) Limitations.--(1) Reimbursement [shall be limited to $5,000 per easement.] for the purchase of an agricultural conservation easement shall not exceed $2,500 per acre or 50% of the appraised per-acre value, whichever is less.(2) The term of an agricultural conservation easement shall be perpetual.(3) An agricultural conservation easement shall:(i) consist of at least 10 acres;(ii) contain the greater of 50% or 10 acres of harvested cropland, pasture or grazing land; and20250HB1059PN1150 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) comply with the provisions of 7 Pa. Code § 138e.16(a)(1) and (3) (relating to minimum criteria for applications).(4) A land trust must provide matching funds equal to the amount of the reimbursement for the purchase of an agricultural conservation easement. Up to 50% of the donated value of the agricultural conservation easement may be used to satisfy the provisions of this paragraph.(5) Reimbursement shall not be provided to a land trust for the expense of an agricultural conservation easement purchased jointly with the county under section 14.1(b.2)(1).(6) Reimbursement of transaction expenses shall be limited to $10,000 per agricultural conservation easement.(e) Eligibility.--To be eligible under this subsection, a land trust shall be an eligible nonprofit entity and shall:(1) register with the State board;(2) coordinate agricultural conservation easement purchase activities with the eligible county in which the activity occurs or coordinate such activities with the State board, if the activity does not occur within an eligible county; and(3) submit an application to the State board, with the statement of costs [incidental to] of the acquisition and transaction expenses, the deed of easement and any other documentation required by the State board, within 60 days of closing on the easement.(f) Transfer to county.--(1) If a land trust ceases to exist, an agricultural conservation easement purchased by the land trust which was reimbursed for purchase costs under this section shall be 20250HB1059PN1150 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transferred to the eligible county where the agricultural conservation easement was recorded or to another eligible nonprofit entity.(2) (Reserved).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1059PN1150 - 6 - 12345